Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1296.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1602 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 1602. Purpose and construction of chapter.* * *(c) Federal law.--To the extent that this chapter conflicts with Federal law or regulation, the Federal law or regulation shall prevail. Notice of nonapplicability shall be transmitted by the department to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1607.1. English proficiency standard.12345678910111213141516171819 (a) Requirement.--To operate a commercial motor vehicle in this Commonwealth, an individual must meet the English proficiency standard under subsection (b).(b) Standard defined.--(1) An individual can read and speak the English language sufficiently to:(i) Converse with the general public.(ii) Understand highway traffic signs and signals in the English language.(iii) Respond to official inquiries.(iv) Make entries on reports and records.(2) The applicability of an individual's qualification to speak in the English language shall not apply to hearing- impaired drivers in accordance with Federal regulation.(c) Offense defined.--An individual who operates a commercial motor vehicle and fails to meet the English proficiency standard under subsection (b) commits a summary offense and, upon conviction, shall be subject to:(1) A fine of $500 for a first offense and a disqualification under section 1611 (relating to disqualification).(2) A fine of $1,000 for a second or subsequent offense and a disqualification under section 1611.(d) Operating prohibition.--(1) A driver found to be in violation of this section shall be prohibited from operating a commercial motor vehicle within this Commonwealth.(2) If the commercial motor vehicle is owned by an employer, the employer shall be notified of the location of the commercial motor vehicle involved in a violation.20260SB1296PN1600 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) If the vehicle is not towed, the employer may only take possession following presentation of a driver who meets the requirements of this chapter.(4) In coordination with the employer, the cargo owner may be notified and allowed to arrange for the transfer of the cargo to another vehicle with a driver properly licensed to operate the commercial motor vehicle, if applicable.(e) Seizure of registration plate.--A person authorized to enforce the provisions of this chapter shall seize the registration plate and impound the commercial motor vehicle if the individual is in violation of this section and the owner of the vehicle is the driver. The individual may petition the department for the return of the registration plate and pay a processing fee of $500.(f) Additional penalties.--(1) An individual convicted under subsection (c) and found to be operating a commercial motor vehicle in this Commonwealth commits a misdemeanor.(2) An individual operating a commercial motor vehicle in this Commonwealth in violation of this section who causes serious bodily injury or death commits a misdemeanor of the third degree.(g) Employer penalty.--An employer whose driver is convicted under this section shall be subject to a fine of $3,000 for each violation.(h) Contractor penalty.--A prime contractor whose subcontractor is a driver and convicted under this section shall be subject to a fine of $3,000 for each violation.Section 3. Section 1611(a) of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 1611. Disqualification.20260SB1296PN1600 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) First violation of certain offenses.--Upon receipt of a report of conviction, the department shall, in addition to any other penalties imposed under this title, disqualify any person from driving a commercial motor vehicle or school vehicle for a period of one year for the first violation of:(1) section 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) or former section 3731, where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(2) section 3742 (relating to accidents involving death or personal injury), where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(3) section 3743 (relating to accidents involving damage to attended vehicle or property), where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(4) section 3745 (relating to accidents involving damage to unattended vehicle or property), where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred;(5) any felony in the commission of which a court determines a motor vehicle was essentially involved and where the person was a commercial driver at the time the violation occurred, except as described in subsection (e);(6) section 1606(c) (relating to requirement for commercial driver's license); [or](7) any offense wherein the person caused the death of a person as a result of a motor vehicle accident through the negligent operation of a commercial motor vehicle, including, but not limited to, a violation of 18 Pa.C.S. § 2504 (relating to involuntary manslaughter) or a violation of section 3732 (relating to homicide by vehicle)[.]; or20260SB1296PN1600 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (8) section 1607.1 (relating to English proficiency standard).* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1296PN1600 - 5 - 1234